Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.5, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 1135.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1135.5. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to


design and issue appropriate official special license plates to


persons wishing to demonstrate support and provide financial


assistance as provided by this section.


Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other


person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of


ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used



Req. No. 909 Page 1


on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been


registered for the current year with a licensed operator.


Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service


Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service


Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.


Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special


license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information


and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon


presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The


license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.


Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a


system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept


applications for special license plates authorized under this


section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant’s


eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount


specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary


information directly into such system and generate a receipt


accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators


shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for


registration of a motor vehicle through June 30, 2025. Through June


30, 2025, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications


and renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement


Fund. Beginning July 1, 2023, fees shall be retained by the



Req. No. 909 Page 2


licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this


title.


If fewer than one hundred of any type of special license plates


authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,


2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of


that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special


license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license


plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration


date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be


removed from the vehicle.


For special license plates authorized on or after July 1, 2004,


no special license plates shall be developed or issued by Service


Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma receives one hundred prepaid


applications therefor. The prepaid applications must be received by


Service Oklahoma within one hundred eighty (180) days of the


effective date of the authorization or the authority to issue shall


be null and void. In the event one hundred prepaid applications are


not received by Service Oklahoma within such prescribed time period


any payment so received shall be refunded accordingly.


B. The special license plates provided by this section are as


follows:


1. University or College Supporter License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support to any state-supported or private university or college. As

Req. No. 909 Page 3


provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


apportioned as provided in Section 1104.1 of this title;


2. Environmental Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be


designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service


Oklahoma by the Department of Environmental Quality in consultation


with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support to implement the statewide general public


Environmental Education Program created pursuant to the provisions


of the Oklahoma Environmental Quality Code. Such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person in any combination of numbers and


letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license


plates. A dealer’s license plate issued pursuant to Section 1116.1


or 1128 of this title may be designated an Environmental Awareness


License Plate upon payment of the fee imposed by this section and


any other registration fees required by the Oklahoma Vehicle License


and Registration Act. As provided in this section, an amount of the


fee collected shall be apportioned pursuant to Section 1104.2 of


this title;


3. Firefighter License Plate - such plates shall be designed


for any career or retired firefighter, volunteer or paid.


Firefighters may apply for firefighter plates for up to four


vehicles with a rated capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a


motorcycle upon proof of a fire department membership by either an


identification card or letter from the chief of the fire department.

Req. No. 909 Page 4


Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of


eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to


provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any


deceased firefighter, if the spouse has not since remarried, may


apply for a firefighter license plate for one vehicle with a rated


carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less or for a motorcycle upon


proof that the deceased firefighter was a member of a fire


department by either an identification card or letter from the chief


of the fire department. The license plate shall be designed in


consultation with the Oklahoma State Firefighters Association.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected


shall be deposited to the Oklahoma State Firemen’s Museum Building &


Memorial Fund for support of the Oklahoma State Firefighters Museum


and the Oklahoma Fallen and Living Firefighters Memorial;


4. Wildlife Conservation License Plate - such plates shall be


designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service


Oklahoma by the Department of Wildlife Conservation in consultation


with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for wildlife conservation in this state through


the Wildlife Diversity Fund, provided for in Section 3-310 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes. Such plates may be designed and issued


to any person as for personalized license plates.





Req. No. 909 Page 5


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected


shall be apportioned pursuant to subsection D of Section 3-310 of


Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Child Abuse Prevention License Plate - such plates shall be


designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service


Oklahoma by the Office of Child Abuse Prevention in the State


Department of Health and the Child Abuse Prevention Action


Committee, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support


for the prevention of child abuse.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected


shall be deposited in the Child Abuse Prevention Fund;


6. United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee Supporter


License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any


person wishing to demonstrate support for the United States Olympic


and Paralympic Committee. The plates shall be issued to any person


in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of


seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain


the official United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a


licensing agreement with the United States Olympic and Paralympic


Committee for any licensing fees which may be required in order to


use the United States Olympic and Paralympic Committee logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment of not



Req. No. 909 Page 6


more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each license plate


issued;


7. Oklahoma History License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate interest in


Oklahoma history. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited to the Oklahoma Historical Society


Revolving Fund to be used for educational purposes;


8. Historic Route 66 License Plate – such:


a. vehicle plates shall be designed to honor historic


Route 66, also known as the “Mother Road”. As


provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected for each vehicle license plate shall be


apportioned to the Oklahoma Historical Society


Revolving Fund to be distributed to the Oklahoma Route


Museum located in Clinton, Oklahoma, and


b. motorcycle plates shall be designed in consultation


with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,


Inc., for any licensing fees which may be required in


order to use the Oklahoma Route 66 Association, Inc.,


logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Oklahoma Route 66 Association,



Req. No. 909 Page 7


Inc., of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each motorcycle license plate issued;


9. Heart of the Heartland License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to honor the victims of


the terrorist bombing attack on the Alfred P. Murrah Federal


Building in downtown Oklahoma City on April 19, 1995. As provided


in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited


in the Heart of the Heartland Scholarship Fund, as established in


Section 2282 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. Emergency Medical Technician License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person who is an emergency


medical technician. Such persons may apply for an emergency medical


technician license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying


capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an emergency medical


technician’s license. The license plate shall be designed in


consultation with the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians


Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be apportioned to the Emergency Medical Personnel


Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


11. Fight Breast Cancer License Plate - such plates shall be


designed to demonstrate support for the prevention and treatment of


breast cancer in this state;



Req. No. 909 Page 8


12. Crime Victims Awareness License Plate - such plates shall


be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


awareness of and support for victims of crimes. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Crime Victims


Compensation Program. As provided in this section, an amount of the


fee collected shall be apportioned to the Attorney General’s


Revolving Fund for the Office of the Attorney General, which is


hereby directed to use such funds to contract with a statewide


nonprofit organization to provide services to crime victims;


13. Safe Kids Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support and


awareness of the Safe Kids Oklahoma. The license plate shall be


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Safe Kids Association.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Children’s Hospital - Oklahoma Safe Kids


Association Revolving Fund to be distributed to the Safe Kids


Oklahoma program;


14. Oklahoma Four-H Club License Plate – such plates shall be


designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by


the Four-H Foundation, and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support of the Oklahoma Four-H Club. Such plates may be


designed and issued to any person as for personalized license


plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected



Req. No. 909 Page 9


shall be apportioned to the OSU Extension Service License Plate


Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.4 of this title;


15. Agricultural Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be


designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,


by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry in


consultation with the Oklahoma Arts Council, and issued to any


person wishing to demonstrate support of the Department’s Ag in the


Classroom Education Program. As provided in this section, an amount


of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section


1104.3 of this title;


16. Oklahoma Statehood Centennial License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate


the centennial of Oklahoma’s admission to statehood in 1907. The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Capitol Complex and Centennial Commemoration Commission. As


provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Oklahoma Department of Commerce Revolving Fund


created in Section 5012 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


17. Support Education License Plate – such plates shall be


designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by


the State Department of Education in consultation with the Oklahoma


Arts Council, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for education in this state. All licensed operators shall


display a sample of the Support Education License plate in the area

Req. No. 909 Page 10


of the business accessed by the public. Twenty-three Dollars


($23.00) of the fee collected shall be apportioned as follows:


a. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Education


Reform Revolving Fund,


b. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education Revolving Fund,


c. five percent (5%) shall be deposited to the State


Career-Technology Fund, and


d. eighty-five percent (85%) shall be deposited to the


Retirement Benefit Fund as set forth in Section 17-108


of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


However, when the Retirement Benefit Fund attains a seventy


percent (70%) funded ratio based on an annual actuarial valuation as


required by law, the amount of the fee shall be apportioned equally


pursuant to subparagraphs a, b and c of this paragraph;


18. Retired Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers License Plate –


such plates shall be designed and issued to any retired officer of


the Oklahoma Highway Patrol. The license plate shall have the


legend “Oklahoma” and shall contain, in the center of the plate, the


Highway Patrol Officers patch using the same colors and pattern as


used in the patch. Centered on the bottom of the license plate


shall be the word “Retired”. The letters “TRP” shall be used in


combination with three numbers on either side of the insignia or


emblem. The color of the letters and numbers shall be brown.

Req. No. 909 Page 11


Retirees who are eligible for such plates shall provide proof of


eligibility upon initial application, but shall not be required to


provide proof of eligibility annually. The surviving spouse of any


deceased retired officer of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, if the


spouse has not since remarried, or if remarried, the remarriage is


terminated by death, divorce, or annulment, may apply for a Retired


Oklahoma Highway Patrol Officers license plate. As provided in this


section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited into the


Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement Fund;


19. Boy Scouts of America Supporter License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Boy Scouts of America. The plates shall be issued


to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to


a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate


shall contain the official Boy Scouts of America logo. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Boy Scouts of America for any licensing


fees which may be required in order to use the Boy Scouts of America


logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment


to the Boy Scouts of America of not more than Twenty Dollars


($20.00) for each license plate issued;


20. Urban Forestry and Beautification License Plate – such


plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to


Service Oklahoma, by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,

Req. No. 909 Page 12


and Forestry in consultation with nonprofit organizations in this


state that develop and operate programs to encourage urban forestry


and beautification, and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support of such programs. As provided in this section, an amount of


the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section 1104.5


of this title;


21. Oklahoma State Parks Supporter License Plate – such plates


shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Serve


Service Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department,


and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


Oklahoma state parks system. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of the


fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tourism and


Recreation Department Revolving Fund. Such money shall be


designated for and may only be expended for the support of Oklahoma


state parks;


22. Adoption Creates Families License Plate – such plates shall


be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support of pregnant


women who are committed to placing their children for adoption and


wishing to provide assistance to guardians, adoptive parents and


other created families to assist in the adoption and placement of


children in permanent, safe homes. The license plates shall be


designed and final terminology delivered in consultation with the


Oklahoma Adoption Coalition and the Department of Human Services.


Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee collected shall be deposited

Req. No. 909 Page 13


in a revolving fund established in the State Treasury for and to be


used by the Department of Human Services for the implementation of


the Investing in Stronger Oklahoma Families Act specifically for


created families;


23. Choose Life License Plate – such plates shall be designed,


subject to criteria presented to Service Oklahoma, by Choose Life


America, Inc., and issued to any person who wishes to demonstrate


support of organizations that encourage adoption as a positive


choice for women with unplanned pregnancies. As provided in this


section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the


Choose Life Assistance Program Revolving Fund established in Section


1104.6 of this title;


24. Future Farmers of America License Plate – such plates shall


be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for


the Oklahoma FFA Association (formerly known as Future Farmers of


America). The license plates shall be designed in consultation with


the Oklahoma FFA Association Board of Directors. As provided in


this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be apportioned as


provided in Section 1104.7 of this title;


25. Lions Club License Plate – such plates shall be designed


and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Lions


Clubs of Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,


as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall be

Req. No. 909 Page 14


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation


and shall contain the official logo of the International Association


of Lions Clubs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into


a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Lions Service Foundation.


The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma


Lions Service Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for


each license plate issued;


26. Color Oklahoma License Plate – such plates shall be


designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by


the Oklahoma Native Plant Society, and issued to any person wishing


to demonstrate support for preserving and planting wildflowers and


native plants in this state and to promote Oklahoma’s wildflower


heritage through education. As provided in this section, an amount


of the fee collected shall be apportioned as provided in Section


1104.8 of this title;


27. Girl Scouts of the United States of America Supporter


License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any


person wishing to demonstrate support for the Girl Scouts of the


United States of America. The plates shall be issued to any person


in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of


seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate shall contain


the official Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized, if necessary, to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Girl Scouts of the United States of

Req. No. 909 Page 15


America for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use


the Girl Scouts of the United States of America logo or design. The


licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Magic Empire


Council of Girl Scouts, acting on behalf of all Oklahoma Girl Scout


councils, of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued;


28. Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon. The plate shall be


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon for any licensing


fees which may be required in order to use the Oklahoma City


Memorial Marathon logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon of not


more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


29. Oklahoma Scenic Rivers License Plate – such plates shall be


designed to demonstrate support for the Grand River Dam Authority.


The plates shall be designed in consultation with the Grand River


Dam Authority. Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the fee shall be


apportioned to the Grand River Dam Authority;


30. Fight Cancer License Plate – such plates shall be designed


to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry.


The plate shall contain the American Cancer Society logo. The

Req. No. 909 Page 16


American Cancer Society logo shall be used in accordance with the


American Cancer Society’s branding guidelines and shall only be


utilized to support the Oklahoma Central Cancer Registry. Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) of the fee shall be apportioned to the Oklahoma


Central Cancer Registry Revolving Fund;


31. Animal Friendly License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


controlling the overpopulation of dogs and cats through educational


and sterilization efforts. The plates shall be designed in


consultation with the Veterinary Medical Association. Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be designated by the


purchaser of the plate to be deposited in the Oklahoma Pet


Overpopulation Fund created in Section 2368.13 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or the Animal Friendly Revolving Fund created in


Section 1104.10 of this title;


32. Patriot License Plate - such plates shall be designed in


consultation with the Military Department of the State of Oklahoma


and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Oklahoma


residents who are members of the Oklahoma National Guard and


deployed on active duty. The plates shall be issued to any person


in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of


seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided in this


section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the



Req. No. 909 Page 17


Patriot License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.11 of


this title;


33. Global War on Terrorism License Plate - such plate shall be


designed in consultation with the Military Department of the State


of Oklahoma and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support


for Oklahoma residents who are members of the Armed Forces of the


United States or Oklahoma National Guard that have served in the


Global War on Terrorism. The plate shall be issued to any person in


any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.


As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in


Section 235.1 of Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. Boys and Girls Clubs of America Supporter License Plate –


such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Boys and Girls Clubs of America. The


plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers


and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized


license plates. The plate shall contain the official Boys and Girls


Clubs of America logo. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter


into a licensing agreement with the Boys and Girls Clubs of America


for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


Boys and Girls Clubs of America logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to the Boys and Girls Clubs of



Req. No. 909 Page 18


America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued;


35. Oklahoma Quarter Horse License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the American Quarter Horse in this state. The plate shall be


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Quarter Horse


Association. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee


collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Quarter Horse Revolving


Fund created in Section 1104.12 of this title;


36. Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License Plate – such


plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Association for the Deaf and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for Oklahoma residents who are deaf. The plates


shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and


letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license


plates. As provided in this section, a portion of the fee collected


shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Association for the Deaf License


Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.15 of this title;


37. Oklahoma City Zoo License Plate – such plates shall be


issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma


City Zoo. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with


the Oklahoma Zoological Society, Inc. As provided in this section,


an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma



Req. No. 909 Page 19


Zoological Society Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.13 of this


title;


38. March of Dimes License Plate – such plates shall be issued


to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the March of Dimes


mission to improve the health of babies by preventing birth defects,


premature birth and infant mortality. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter March of Dimes.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Oklahoma Prevent Birth Defects, Premature Birth and


Infant Mortality Fund established in Section 1104.14 of this title;


39. Support Our Troops Supporter License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for Support Our Troops Incorporated. The plates shall be


issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from


one to a maximum of six. The plate shall contain the official


Support Our Troops Incorporated logo which includes the mark


“Support Our Troops” across the bottom of the plate. Service


Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with


Support Our Troops Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the Support Our Troops Incorporated logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to


Support Our Troops Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for


each license plate issued;



Req. No. 909 Page 20


40. Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate – such plates shall


be authorized to be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor


Incorporated, a nonprofit charitable organization exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), providing educational scholarships to


spouses and children of America’s fallen and disabled military


service members. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.


Such person may apply for a Folds of Honor Supporter license plate


for a motorcycle; provided, the license plate for motorcycles may be


of similar design to the license plate for motor vehicles or may be


a new design in order to meet space requirements for a motorcycle


license plate. The plate shall be designed in consultation with the


Oklahoma City Chapter of Folds of Honor Incorporated and shall


contain the official Folds of Honor Incorporated logo which includes


the mark “Folds of Honor” across the bottom of the plate. Service


Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter into a licensing agreement with


Folds of Honor Incorporated for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the Folds of Honor Incorporated logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to


Folds of Honor Incorporated of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each


license plate issued. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of



Req. No. 909 Page 21


this section, the Folds of Honor Supporter License Plate is hereby


reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;


41. Armed Forces Veterans Motorcycle License Plate – such


plates shall be designed for use on a motorcycle in consultation


with A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma, Inc.


(ABATE), and issued to any honorably discharged former member of the


United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate support for the


Oklahoma National Guard Museum. Persons applying for such license


plate must show proof of past military service. As provided in this


section, a portion of the fee collected shall be deposited in the


Oklahoma National Guard Museum Fund created in Section 235.1 of


Title 44 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


42. Buffalo Soldier License Plate - such plates shall be issued


to any person wishing to honor and celebrate the history and


contribution of the Buffalo Soldiers. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Lawton-Fort Sill Chapter of the


Buffalo Soldiers 9th and 10th (Horse) Cavalry National Association.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Buffalo Soldier License Plate Revolving Fund


created in Section 1104.16 of this title;


43. Prevent Blindness Oklahoma License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for vision screening of school age children in this state. The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with Prevent

Req. No. 909 Page 22


Blindness Oklahoma. As provided in this section, an amount of the


fee collected shall be deposited in the Prevent Blindness Oklahoma


License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.17 of this


title;


44. Oklahoma State Capitol Restoration License Plate - such


plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for restoration of the Oklahoma State Capitol


building. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with


the Friends of the Capitol corporation, created pursuant to Section


15.4 of Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes and the State Capitol


Preservation Commission created pursuant to Section 4102 of Title 74


of the Oklahoma Statutes. As provided in this section, an amount of


the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Friends of the


Capitol License Plate Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.18


of this title;


45. Eastern Red Cedar Tree License Plate – such plates shall be


designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma


and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


removal of Eastern Redcedar trees from lands in the state and to


develop marketable uses for the harvested trees. The license plate


shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of


Agriculture, Food, and Forestry. Twenty-three Dollars ($23.00) of


the fee collected shall be deposited in the Eastern Redcedar


Revolving Fund created in Section 18-407 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 909 Page 23


Statutes. The money shall be designated for and may only be


expended for the purposes as set forth in the Eastern Redcedar


Management Act;


46. Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for the University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer


Research Fund. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of six.


The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the


University of Oklahoma Foundation, Pancreatic Cancer Research Fund.


As provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Pancreatic Cancer Research License Plate Revolving


Fund created in Section 1104.19 of this title;


47. Alzheimer’s Research License Plate - such plates shall be


issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the


Oklahoma Chapter of the Alzheimer’s Association. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the


Alzheimer’s Association. As provided in this section, an amount of


the fee collected shall be deposited in the Alzheimer’s Research


License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.20 of this


title;


48. Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for the Oklahoma Hospice and Palliative Care Association. The

Req. No. 909 Page 24


license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Hospice and Palliative Care Association. As provided in this


section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the


Hospice and Palliative Care License Plate Revolving Fund created in


Section 1104.21 of this title;


49. Juvenile Diabetes Research License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research


Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation


with the Oklahoma Chapters of the Juvenile Diabetes Research


Foundation. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited in the Juvenile Diabetes Research


License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.22 of this


title;


50. Deer Creek Schools Foundation License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for the Deer Creek Schools Foundation. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Deer Creek Schools Foundation.


The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of


numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for


personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount


of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Deer Creek Schools


Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.23


of this title;

Req. No. 909 Page 25


51. Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate - such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to provide financial support


for the Oklahoma Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Chapter of the Lupus Foundation of America. As provided in this


section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the


Oklahoma Lupus License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section


1104.24 of this title. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of


this section, the Lupus Awareness and Education License Plate is


hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2018;


52. Chiefs of Police License Plate - such plates shall be


issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the


Oklahoma Association of Chiefs of Police for a vehicle or motorcycle


in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of


seven, as for personalized license plates. The license plates shall


be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs


of Police. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar


design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the space


requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma shall


be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma


Association of Chiefs of Police for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the association’s logo or design. The


licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma


Association of Chiefs of Police of not more than Twenty Dollars

Req. No. 909 Page 26


($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to the provisions


of subsection A of this section, the Chiefs of Police License Plate


is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;


53. Crossings Christian School License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for Crossings Christian School located in Oklahoma City.


The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the


administration of Crossings Christian School. Service Oklahoma


shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with


Crossings Christian School for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the school’s logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to the Crossings Christian


School of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued;


54. Hilldale Education Foundation License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Hilldale Education Foundation. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the


Hilldale Education Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized


to enter into a licensing agreement with the Hilldale Education


Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to


use the foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Hilldale Education Foundation of not


more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;

Req. No. 909 Page 27


55. Oklahoma Nurses License Plate – such plates shall be issued


to any person licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act


and providing such documentation of current licensure as may be


required by Service Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed


in consultation with the Oklahoma Nurses Association. As provided


in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited


in the Oklahoma Nurses License Plate Revolving Fund created in


Section 1104.26 of this title;


56. Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame License Plate – such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame. The license plates shall be designed


in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma Sports Hall


of Fame. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Hall of


Fame’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a


payment to the Oklahoma Sports Hall of Fame of not more than Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


57. Childhood Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with the administration of the Oklahoma


Children’s Cancer Association. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized


to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Children’s

Req. No. 909 Page 28


Cancer Association for any licensing fees which may be required in


order to use the Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association’s logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the


Oklahoma Children’s Cancer Association of not more than Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


58. Oklahoma Educational Television Authority License Plate –


such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Educational Television


Authority and such plates shall be designed in consultation with the


Authority. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited in The Educational Television Authority


Revolving Fund created in Section 156 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


59. Remembering Fallen Heroes License Plate – such plates shall


be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support


for Concerns of Police Survivors, Inc. Such plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Concerns of


Police Survivors, Inc. As provided in this section, an amount of


the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Concerns of


Police Survivors License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section


1104.27 of this title;


60. Disabled American Veterans License Plate – such plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Disabled American


Veterans of Oklahoma and issued to any member of the organization

Req. No. 909 Page 29


wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be


authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Disabled


American Veterans of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The


licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Disabled


American Veterans of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars


($20.00) for each license plate issued. The plates shall


incorporate a numbering system agreed upon by the Disabled American


Veterans of Oklahoma and Service Oklahoma;


61. Owasso Rams Supporter License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the Owasso Rams, and shall be designed in consultation with


representatives of Owasso Public Schools. The plates shall be


issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from


one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As


provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section


34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


62. Collinsville Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such


plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Collinsville Cardinals, and shall be


designed in consultation with representatives of Collinsville Public


Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,

Req. No. 909 Page 30


as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an


amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education


Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


63. Sperry Pirates Supporter License Plate - such plates shall


be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support


for the Sperry Pirates, and shall be designed in consultation with


representatives of Sperry Schools. The plates shall be issued to


any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a


maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. As provided


in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited


in the Education Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of


Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


64. Skiatook Bulldogs Supporter License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Skiatook Bulldogs, and shall be designed in


consultation with representatives of Skiatook Public Schools. The


plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers


and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized


license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund


created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


65. Rejoice Christian Eagles Supporter License Plate - such


plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to

Req. No. 909 Page 31


demonstrate support for the Rejoice Christian Eagles, and shall be


designed in consultation with representatives of Rejoice Christian


Schools. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,


as for personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an


amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education


Reform Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


66. East Central Cardinals Supporter License Plate - such


plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the East Central Cardinals, and shall be


designed in consultation with representatives of East Central High


School. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination


of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for


personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount


of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform


Revolving Fund created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


67. Southeast Spartans Supporter License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Southeast Spartans, and shall be designed in


consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association. The


plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of numbers


and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized

Req. No. 909 Page 32


license plates. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited in the Education Reform Revolving Fund


created in Section 34.89 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


68. Sooner State ABATE License Plate - such plates shall be


issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for Sooner


State ABATE (A Brotherhood Against Totalitarian Enactments). The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with Sooner State


ABATE. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination


of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for


personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of


similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the


space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma


shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Sooner


State ABATE for any licensing fees, which may be required in order


to use the association’s logo or design. The licensing agreement


shall provide for a payment to Sooner State ABATE of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued. Subject to


the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sooner State


ABATE License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,


2019;


69. Oklahoma License to Educate License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for Oklahoma educators. Such plates shall be designed in


consultation with the State Department of Education. As provided in

Req. No. 909 Page 33


this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in


the Oklahoma Teacher Recruitment Revolving Fund created in Section


6-132 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


70. Piedmont Education Foundation License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation. Such


plates shall be designed in consultation with the Foundation. As


provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Piedmont Public Schools Education Foundation


License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.28 of this


title;


71. The Pride of Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the Pride of Oklahoma marching band and shall be designed in


consultation with the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement


with the University of Oklahoma or the Pride of Oklahoma marching


band for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use


the applicable logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Pride of Oklahoma Fund at the


University of Oklahoma Foundation, Inc. of not more than Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


72. Jenks Trojans License Plate - such plates shall be designed


and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the

Req. No. 909 Page 34


Jenks school district. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the administration of the Jenks school district.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Jenks school district for any licensing fees


which may be required in order to use the school district’s logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the


Jenks school district of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


73. Bixby Spartans License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the Bixby school district. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the administration of the Bixby school district.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Bixby school district for any licensing fees


which may be required in order to use the school district’s logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the


Bixby school district of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


74. Oklahoma Department of Aerospace and Aeronautics License


Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any person


wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma aviation industry


and to promote awareness of aviation and aerospace. Such plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of


Aerospace and Aeronautics and shall be issued to any person in any

Req. No. 909 Page 35


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,


as for personalized license plates. Twenty-four Dollars ($24.00) of


the fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Department of


Aerospace and Aeronautics Revolving Fund, for expenditure as


provided in Section 91 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


75. Ducks Unlimited License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


Ducks Unlimited. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with


Ducks Unlimited. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into


a licensing agreement with Ducks Unlimited for any licensing fee


which may be required in order to use the Ducks Unlimited logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to


Ducks Unlimited of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each


license plate issued;


76. Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate - such


plates shall be issued to any person wishing to increase awareness


of those who are currently prisoners of war or missing in action and


provide financial support for current veterans. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with Rolling Thunder Oklahoma. As


provided in this section, an amount of the fee collected shall be


deposited in the Prisoner of War and Missing in Action License Plate


Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.29 of this title;


77. Woodward Boomers License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for

Req. No. 909 Page 36


the Woodward school district. The license plates shall be designed


in consultation with the administration of the Woodward school


district. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Woodward school district for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the school


district’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Woodward school district of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


78. Clinton Public School Foundation License Plate – such


plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Clinton Public School Foundation. The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Clinton


Public School Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to


enter into a licensing agreement with the Clinton Public School


Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to


use the school foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement


shall provide for a payment to the Clinton Public School Foundation


of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate


issued;


79. Navajo School Foundation License Plate – such plates shall


be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


Navajo School Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the administration of the Navajo School


Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a

Req. No. 909 Page 37


licensing agreement with the Navajo School Foundation for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Navajo School Foundation of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


80. Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate – such


plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Music


Hall of Fame Inc. and issued to any member of the organization


wishing to demonstrate support. Service Oklahoma shall be


authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma


Music Hall of Fame Inc. for any licensing fees which may be required


in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Music Hall of


Fame Inc. of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued. The plates shall incorporate a numbering system


agreed upon by the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. and Service


Oklahoma. Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this


section, the Oklahoma Music Hall of Fame Inc. License Plate is


hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2019;


81. Techlahoma Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be


issued to any person wishing to provide financial support for the


Techlahoma Foundation. The license plate shall be designed in


consultation with the Techlahoma Foundation. The plate shall be


issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from

Req. No. 909 Page 38


one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Techlahoma Foundation for any licensing fees,


which may be required in order to use the association’s logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the


Techlahoma Foundation of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


82. Bethany Public Schools Foundation License Plate – such


plates shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support


for the Bethany Public Schools Foundation. The license plates shall


be designed in consultation with the administration of the Bethany


Public Schools Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to


enter into a licensing agreement with the Bethany Public Schools


Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required in order to


use the Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Bethany Public Schools Foundation of


not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


83. Cystic Fibrosis Foundation License Plate – such plates


shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the


Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the administration of the Cystic Fibrosis


Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the

Req. No. 909 Page 39


Foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


84. Down Syndrome Association of Central Oklahoma License Plate


- such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Down Syndrome Association of Central


Oklahoma. Such plates shall be designed in consultation with the


Association. As provided in this section, an amount of the fee


collected shall be deposited in the Down Syndrome Association of


Central Oklahoma License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section


1104.30 of this title;


85. Elk City Education Foundation License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Elk City Education Foundation. Such plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Foundation. As provided in this


section, an amount of the fee collected shall be deposited in the


Elk City Education Foundation License Plate Revolving Fund created


in Section 1104.31 of this title;


86. A Brotherhood Aiming Toward Education of Oklahoma (ABATE)


License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any


person wishing to provide financial support for ABATE of Oklahoma.


Such plates shall be designed in consultation with ABATE of


Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person in any


combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,

Req. No. 909 Page 40


as for personalized plates. The license plate for a motorcycle may


be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to


meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement


with ABATE of Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required


in order to use the ABATE of Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to ABATE of Oklahoma of not


more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


87. Downed Bikers Association License Plate - such plates shall


be designed for a vehicle or motorcycle in any combination of


numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for


personalized license plates, and issued to any person wishing to


demonstrate support for the Downed Bikers Association, a nonprofit


charitable organization exempt from taxation pursuant to the


provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3), which provides emotional and financial support for downed


bikers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with


the Central Oklahoma Chapter of the Downed Bikers Association and


shall contain any official logo or design of the organization. The


license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space


permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a


motorcycle license plate. Service Oklahoma, if necessary, may enter


into a licensing agreement with the Downed Bikers Association for


any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the

Req. No. 909 Page 41


organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Downed Bikers Association of not more


than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate;


88. Eagle Scout License Plate – such plates shall be designed


to demonstrate support for Eagle Scouts of the Boy Scouts of America


and shall include the Eagle Scout logo. Plates may be issued to any


person who can show proof of having obtained the rank of Eagle


Scout. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the various Oklahoma local councils for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the applicable


logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment


of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate


issued to the specific Oklahoma local area council designated by the


applicant;


89. Extraordinary Educators License Plate – such plates shall


be designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial


support for common education in this state. Such plates shall be


designed in consultation with the State Department of Education.


The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of


numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for


personalized license plates. As provided in this section, an amount


of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Extraordinary


Educators License Plate Revolving Fund created in Section 1104.32 of


this title;

Req. No. 909 Page 42


90. Former Oklahoma Legislator License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person who previously served as


a member of the House of Representatives or Senate. The license


plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Historical Society. As provided in this section, an amount of the


fee collected shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Historical Society


Capital Improvement and Operations Revolving Fund created in Section


1.10a of Title 53 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Service Oklahoma shall


create and maintain a list of former members of the House of


Representatives and Senate eligible to be issued such plates;


provided, that no former member of the House of Representatives and


Senate shall be eligible to possess more than two of such plates at


any one time. Service Oklahoma shall confer as needed with the


Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the


Senate to confirm that such list is complete and accurate;


91. Monarch Butterfly License Plate - such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the operations of the Oklahoma Monarch Society. Such plates shall


be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Monarch Society.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with the Oklahoma Monarch Society for any licensing fees


which may be required in order to use the foundation’s logo or


design. The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination


of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for

Req. No. 909 Page 43


personalized license plates. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Oklahoma Monarch Society of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


92. Oklahoma Tennis Foundation License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Tennis


Foundation. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


foundation’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for a payment to the Oklahoma Tennis Foundation of not more than


Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


93. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars License Plate - such


plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign


Wars Chapters and shall be issued to any resident of this state upon


proof of membership in the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars


organization. The license plates shall be designed in consultation


with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement


with the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars organization for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars

Req. No. 909 Page 44


organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each


license plate issued. Service Oklahoma shall reinstate any Veterans


of Foreign Wars license plates issued prior to November 1, 2021, and


shall reimburse any individual who held a Veterans of Foreign Wars


License Plate on October 31, 2021, for fees incurred for the


replacement of such plate;


94. Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization License Plate – such


plates shall be designed and issued to any female veteran of any


branch of the United States Armed Forces wishing to demonstrate


support for the Oklahoma Women Veterans Organization. The license


plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Women


Veterans Organization. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to


enter into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Women Veterans


Organization for any licensing fees which may be required in order


to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement


shall provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Women Veterans


Organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each


license plate issued;


95. FIRST (For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and


Technology) in Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be issued


to any person wishing to demonstrate support for FIRST in Oklahoma


Robotics programs. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the administration of FIRST in Oklahoma. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement

Req. No. 909 Page 45


with FIRST in Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required


in order to use the FIRST in Oklahoma logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to FIRST in Oklahoma of not


more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


96. Pittsburg State University License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Pittsburg State University. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with Pittsburg State University.


Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing


agreement with Pittsburg State University for any licensing fees


which may be required in order to use the school foundation’s logo


or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to


the Pittsburg State University of not more than Twenty Dollars


($20.00) for each license plate issued;


97. Greenwood Historical District License Plate – such plates


shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the


Tulsa Juneteenth Festival held in the Greenwood Historical District


in Tulsa, Oklahoma. The plates shall be issued to any person for a


vehicle or a motorcycle in any combination of numbers and letters


from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.


The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Black


Wall Street Chamber of Commerce Tulsa Juneteenth, Inc. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement


with the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival for any licensing fees which may

Req. No. 909 Page 46


be required in order to use the Festival’s logo or design. The


license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space


permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a


motorcycle license plate. For each license plate issued, the


licensing agreement shall provide for a payment of Twenty-five


Dollars ($25.00) Twenty-seven Dollars ($27.00) of the fee collected


to the Tulsa Juneteenth Festival and an additional Two Dollars


($2.00) of the fee collected shall be deposited in the Public School


Classroom Support Revolving Fund, for expenditure as provided in


Section 1-123 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


98. Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters


License Plate - such plates shall be designed to honor the Oklahoma


Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary Chapters and issued to any


resident of this state upon proof of membership in the Oklahoma


Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization in this state. The


license plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma


Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization. Service Oklahoma


shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the


Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars Auxiliary organization for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Veterans of Foreign Wars


Auxiliary organization of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;

Req. No. 909 Page 47


99. Transportation to Transportation License Plate – such


plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to support


county roads and bridges. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the Association of County Commissioners of


Oklahoma. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fee collected shall be


paid to the county treasurer for the county in which the license


plate was purchased to be credited to the county highway fund


created pursuant to Section 1503 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


100. Blue Star Mothers License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person showing proof of membership in an


Oklahoma Chapter of Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc. The license


plates shall be designed in consultation with Blue Star Mothers of


America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One. Service Oklahoma shall be


authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with Blue Star


Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One for any licensing


fees which may be required in order to use the Blue Star Mothers of


America logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a


payment to Blue Star Mothers of America, Inc., Oklahoma Chapter One


of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate


issued;


101. Oklahoma Golf License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the sport of golf in this state. The license plates shall be

Req. No. 909 Page 48


designed in consultation with the South Central Section of the


Professional Golfers’ Association of America and issued to any


person wishing to demonstrate support for the sport of golf in this


state. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with the South Central Section of the


Professional Golfers’ Association of America for any licensing fees


which may be required in order to use the organization’s logo or


design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the


South Central Section of the Professional Golfers’ Association of


America of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued;


102. Paramedic License Plate - such plates shall be designed


and issued to any person who is a paramedic. Such persons may apply


for a paramedic license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying


capacity of one (1) ton or less or a motorcycle upon proof of a


paramedic license. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the Oklahoma State University-Oklahoma City


Paramedicine program and the Oklahoma Emergency Medical Technicians


Association. The letters “PM” shall be placed on the plate followed


by four random numbers, or such numbers as requested by such persons


applying for the plate. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) of the fees


collected shall be deposited in the Emergency Medical Personnel


Death Benefit Revolving Fund created in Section 1-2505.2 of Title 63


of the Oklahoma Statutes. Subject to the provisions of subsection A

Req. No. 909 Page 49


of this section, the Paramedic License Plate is hereby reauthorized


effective November 1, 2022;


103. National Defense Service Medal License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to those persons who have received the


National Defense Service Medal and wish to demonstrate support for


the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Department of


Veterans Affairs. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter


into a licensing agreement with the Oklahoma Department of Veterans


Affairs for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use


the Department’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs


of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate


issued;


104. University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS License Plate – such


plates shall be designed and issued to any past or present member of


the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS upon providing proof of


membership in the organization as may be required by Service


Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with


the University of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS. Service Oklahoma shall be


authorized to enter into a licensing agreement with the University


of Oklahoma RUF/NEKS for any licensing fees which may be required in


order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to the Mike James RUF/NEKS

Req. No. 909 Page 50


Memorial Scholarship of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


105. Tulsa Community College License Plate – such plates shall


be issued to persons wishing to support Tulsa Community College.


The plates shall be designed in consultation with Tulsa Community


College. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a


licensing agreement with Tulsa Community College for any licensing


fees which may be required in order to use the organization’s logo


or design. The licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to


Tulsa Community College of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


106. Street Kings Car Club License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the Street Kings Car Club in Guthrie. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with the Street Kings Car Club. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into a licensing agreement


with the Street Kings Car Club for any licensing fees which may be


required in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The


licensing agreement shall provide for a payment to the Street Kings


Car Club of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license


plate issued;


107. Epilepsy Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the Epilepsy Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in

Req. No. 909 Page 51


consultation with the Epilepsy Foundation of Oklahoma. Service


Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into licensing agreements with


the Epilepsy Foundation for any licensing fees which may be required


in order to use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing


agreement shall provide for a payment to the Epilepsy Foundation of


not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued;


108. America First License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for


the proclamation of “America First”. The license plates shall be


designed in consultation with Warriors for Freedom and the Honoring


America’s Warriors Foundations. Service Oklahoma shall be


authorized to enter into licensing agreements with the Warriors for


Freedom and Honoring America’s Warriors Foundations for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the


Foundations’ logos or designs. The licensing agreements shall


provide for a payment to the Honoring America’s Warriors Foundation


of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) and a payment to the Warriors


for Freedom Foundation of not more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) for


each license plate issued;


109. Diabetes Awareness License Plate – such plates shall be


designed and issued to any person wishing to provide financial


support for Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with Diabetes Solutions of


Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into

Req. No. 909 Page 52


licensing agreements with Diabetes Solutions of Oklahoma for any


licensing fees which may be required in order to use the Diabetes


Solutions of Oklahoma logos or designs. The licensing agreements


shall provide for a deposit to the Diabetes Awareness License Plate


Revolving Fund established in Section 1104.33 of this title;


110. Alliance of Mental Health Providers of Oklahoma License


Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person


wishing to demonstrate support for the Alliance of Mental Health


Providers of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in


consultation with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of


Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into


licensing agreements with the Alliance of Mental Health Providers of


Oklahoma for any licensing fees which may be required in order to


use the organization’s logo or design. The licensing agreement


shall provide for a payment to the Alliance of Mental Health


Providers of Oklahoma of not more than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for


each license plate issued;


111. Stillwater Public Schools License Plate - such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for the Stillwater School District. The license plates


shall be designed in consultation with the administration of the


Stillwater School District. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to


enter into a licensing agreement with the Stillwater School District


for any licensing fees which may be required in order to use the

Req. No. 909 Page 53


school district’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall


provide for a payment to the Stillwater School District of not more


than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued; and


112. Broken Arrow Public Schools License Plate – such plates


shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate


support for Broken Arrow Public Schools. The license plates shall


be designed in consultation with the administration of Broken Arrow


Public Schools. Service Oklahoma shall be authorized to enter into


a licensing agreement with Broken Arrow Public Schools for any


licensing fee which may be required in order to use the school


district’s logo or design. The licensing agreement shall provide


for payment to Broken Arrow Public Schools of not more than Twenty


Dollars ($20.00) for each license plate issued.


C. The fee for such plates shall be Thirty-five Dollars


($35.00) per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other


registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and


Registration Act. The fee shall be apportioned as follows through


June 30, 2023:


1. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) per year of renewal or any other


amount as provided in this title of the fee shall be apportioned as


provided or deposited in a fund as specified within the paragraph


authorizing the special license plate;


2. Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the fee shall


be deposited in the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for

Req. No. 909 Page 54


the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration


Act. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year of


renewal of the fee shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma


Reimbursement Fund to be used for the administration of the Oklahoma


Vehicle License and Registration Act; and


3. Any remaining amounts of the fee shall be apportioned as


provided in Section 1104 of this title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-909 MSBB 1/16/2025 2:56:22 PM





























Req. No. 909 Page 55